District of Columbia statutes.
20-532

Bond.

A special administrator shall satisfy the requirements of section 20-502 relating to the bond of a personal representative.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-532.